Nebraska, session 109, LB15.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB15 LB15
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate an
additional $600,000 from the General Fund for FY2025-26 and an additional
$600,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the Supreme Court, Agency
5, for Court Administration, Program No. 34, to increase the payments for
interpreter services for deaf and hard of hearing persons and for persons
unable to communicate the English language, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-